cs: Typ poštovní známky: Středové razítko (bullseye); CTO (razítkováno na objednávku); Razítko prvního dne vydání (FDC); Ruční razítko; Silné razítko; Slabé razítko; Strojové razítko; Balíkové razítko; Předběžné znehodnocení (precancel); Razítko na střed (SOTN); Neorazítkované (nepoužité); Jiné
fi: Postileiman tyyppi: Keskiöleima; Tilausleimattu (CTO); Ensipäivänleima; Käsileima; Raskas leima; Kevyt leima; Koneleima; Pakettileima; Esileimattu; Tarkka keskiöleima (SOTN); Leimaamaton (käyttämätön); Muu
nb: Poststempeltype: Sentrert stempel (bullseye); CTO (massestemplet); Førstedagsstempel; Håndstempel; Kraftig stempel; Lett stempel; Maskinstempel; Pakkestempel; Forhåndsstempel; Sentrert stempel (SOTN); Ustemplet (ubrukt); Annet
bg-BG: Вид пощенско клеймо: Централно клеймо (Bullseye); Клеймовани по поръчка (CTO); Клеймо на първия ден; Ръчно клеймо; Силно клеймо; Слабо клеймо; Машинно клеймо; Колетно клеймо; Предварително клеймо; Централно клеймо (SOTN); Неклеймовани (неизползвани); Друго
ro-RO: Tipul ștampilei poștale: Ștampilă centrată; CTO (obliterat la comandă); Ștampilă din prima zi; Ștampilă manuală; Ștampilă accentuată; Ștampilă discretă; Ștampilă mecanică; Ștampilă pentru colete; Preobliterat; Ștampilă centrată (SOTN); Neobliterat (nefolosit); Altele
da: Poststempeltype: Centreret stempel (bullseye); CTO (fremstempling); Førstedagsstempel; Håndstempel; Kraftigt stempel; Let stempel; Maskinstempel; Pakkestempel; Forudstempling; Centreret stempel (SOTN); Ustemplet (ubrugt); Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta poštnega žiga: Središčni žig; CTO (žigosano po naročilu); Žig prvega dne; Ročni žig; Močen žig; Rahel žig; Strojni žig; Paketni žig; Predhodni žig; Središčni žig (SOTN); Nežigosano (neuporabljeno); Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta poštanskog žiga: Žig u obliku mete; CTO (poništeno na zahtjev); Žig prvog dana; Ručni žig; Jaki žig; Slabi žig; Strojni žig; Paketni žig; Predžig; Žig točno u sredini (SOTN); Neponišteno (neiskorišteno); Ostalo
ja: 消印の種類: ブルズアイ消印; CTO (注文消印); 初日印; 手押し印; 重い消印; 軽い消印; 機械印; 小包印; プレキャンセル (事前消印); 満月印 (SOTN); 未消印 (未使用); その他
nl: Poststempel type: Bullseye-stempel; CTO (cancelled-to-order); Eerstedagstempel; Handstempel; Zwaar stempel; Licht stempel; Machinestempel; Pakketstempel; Voorafstempeling; Socked-on-the-nose (SOTN); Ongestempeld (ongebruikt); Overig
pl: Typ stempla pocztowego: Kasownik centralny (bullseye); CTO (kasowane na zamówienie); Kasownik pierwszego dnia obiegu; Kasownik ręczny; Mocne stemplowanie; Lekkie stemplowanie; Kasownik maszynowy; Kasownik paczkowy; Wstępne kasowanie; Kasownik idealnie wycentrowany (SOTN); Niekasowany (czysty); Inne
tr: Posta damgası türü: Hedef damgası; CTO (sipariş üzerine damgalanmış); İlk gün damgası; El damgası; Ağır damga; Hafif damga; Makine damgası; Koli damgası; Ön damga; Hedef damgası (SOTN); Damgasız (kullanılmamış); Diğer
zh-CN: 邮戳类型: 牛眼戳; 盖销票 (CTO); 首日戳; 手工戳; 重戳; 轻戳; 机器戳; 包裹戳; 预销票; 正中戳 (SOTN); 未盖销（未使用）; 其他
it: Tipo di timbro postale: Annullamento circolare; CTO (annullato su ordinazione); Annullamento primo giorno; Annullamento manuale; Annullamento marcato; Annullamento leggero; Annullamento meccanico; Annullamento per pacchi; Preannullato; Socked-on-the-nose (SOTN); Non annullato (non usato); Altro
es: Tipo de matasellos: Cancelación de diana; CTO (cancelado por encargo); Cancelación de primer día; Cancelación manual; Cancelación fuerte; Cancelación ligera; Cancelación mecánica; Cancelación de paquete; Precancelación; Cancelación centrada (SOTN); Sin cancelar (nuevo); Otro
lt-LT: Pašto antspaudo tipas: Centrinis atspaudas; CTO (anuliuota pagal užsakymą); Pirmos dienos atspaudas; Rankinis atspaudas; Ryškus atspaudas; Neryškus atspaudas; Mašininis atspaudas; Siuntinio atspaudas; Išankstinis anuliavimas; Centrinis atspaudas (SOTN); Neanuliuota (nepanaudota); Kita
zh-TW: 郵戳類型: 靶心郵戳; 蓋銷票 (CTO); 首日戳; 手工蓋銷戳; 重印郵戳; 輕印郵戳; 機器蓋銷戳; 包裹戳; 預先蓋銷戳; 正中郵戳 (SOTN); 未蓋銷 (未使用); 其他
pt-BR: Carimbo postal tipo: Carimbo de olho de boi; CTO (cancelado sob encomenda); Carimbo de primeiro dia; Carimbo manual; Carimbo pesado; Carimbo leve; Carimbo de máquina; Carimbo de encomenda; Pré-carimbo; Carimbo centralizado (SOTN); Não carimbado (não usado); Outros
pt-PT: Tipo de carimbo postal: Carimbo bullseye; CTO (cancelado sob encomenda); Carimbo de primeiro dia; Carimbo manual; Carimbo forte; Carimbo leve; Carimbo mecânico; Carimbo de encomenda; Pré-carimbo; Carimbo centrado (SOTN); Não carimbado (não utilizado); Outro
sv: Poststämpeltyp: Centrumstämpel; CTO (fackstämpel); Förstadagsstämpel; Handstämpel; Kraftig stämpel; Lätt stämpel; Maskinstämpel; Paketstämpel; Förhandsmakulering; Centrumstämpel (SOTN); Ostämplad (oanvänd); Annat
de: Art des Poststempels: Zentrischer Stempel; CTO (Gefälligkeitsentwertung); Ersttagsstempel; Handstempel; Starker Stempel; Leichter Stempel; Maschinenstempel; Paketstempel; Vorausentwertung; Zentrischer Stempel (SOTN); Ungestempelt (ungebraucht); Sonstige
ko: 소인 유형: 과녁 소인; CTO(주문 소인); 초일 소인; 핸드스탬프 소인; 진한 소인; 연한 소인; 기계 소인; 소포 소인; 사전 소인; 정중앙 소인(SOTN); 미소인(미사용); 기타
en: Postmark type: Bullseye cancel; CTO (cancelled-to-order); First day cancel; Handstamp cancel; Heavy cancel; Light cancel; Machine cancel; Parcel cancel; Precancel; Socked-on-the-nose (SOTN); Uncancelled (unused); Other
th: ประเภทตราประทับไปรษณีย์: ตราประทับตรงกลางดวง; CTO (ประทับตรายกเลิกแล้ว); ตราประทับวันแรกจำหน่าย; ตราประทับด้วยมือ; ตราประทับหนัก; ตราประทับเบา; ตราประทับด้วยเครื่อง; ตราประทับพัสดุ; ประทับตราล่วงหน้า; Socked-on-the-nose (SOTN); ยังไม่ประทับตรา (ยังไม่ได้ใช้); อื่นๆ
hu: Bélyegzés típusa: Telitalálatos bélyegzés; CTO (rendelésre bélyegzett); Első napi bélyegzés; Kézi bélyegzés; Erős bélyegzés; Enyhe bélyegzés; Gépi bélyegzés; Csomagbélyegzés; Előbélyegzett; Középponti bélyegzés (SOTN); Bélyegzés nélküli (használatlan); Egyéb
fr: Type d’oblitération: Oblitération œil de bœuf; Oblitéré sur commande (CTO); Oblitération premier jour; Oblitération manuelle; Oblitération forte; Oblitération légère; Oblitération mécanique; Oblitération pour colis; Préoblitéré; Oblitération centrale (SOTN); Non oblitéré (neuf); Autre
el: Τύπος σφραγίδας ταχυδρομείου: Σφραγίδα Bullseye; CTO (ακυρωμένο κατά παραγγελία); Σφραγίδα πρώτης ημέρας κυκλοφορίας; Σφραγίδα χειρός; Βαριά σφραγίδα; Ελαφριά σφραγίδα; Σφραγίδα μηχανής; Σφραγίδα δέματος; Προακυρωμένο; Κεντραρισμένη σφραγίδα (SOTN); Μη ακυρωμένο (αχρησιμοποίητο); Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ poštovej pečiatky: Stredová pečiatka (Bullseye); CTO (znehodnotené na objednávku); Pečiatka prvého dňa; Ručná pečiatka; Výrazná pečiatka; Jemná pečiatka; Strojová pečiatka; Balíková pečiatka; Predbežné znehodnotenie; Presná stredová pečiatka (SOTN); Neznehodnotené (nepoužité); Iné
ru: Тип почтового штемпеля: Гашение типа «бычий глаз»; CTO (гашение по заказу); Гашение первого дня; Гашение ручным штемпелем; Плотное гашение; Легкое гашение; Машинное гашение; Посылочное гашение; Предварительное гашение; Гашение точно по центру (SOTN); Негашеные (неиспользованные); Другое
vi: Loại dấu bưu điện: Dấu hủy hồng tâm; CTO (Hủy theo yêu cầu); Dấu hủy ngày đầu tiên; Dấu hủy đóng tay; Dấu hủy đậm; Dấu hủy nhạt; Dấu hủy bằng máy; Dấu hủy bưu kiện; Hủy trước; Dấu hủy chính tâm (SOTN); Chưa hủy (chưa sử dụng); Khác